Connecticut, session 2026, SB00289.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 17b-340d of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(2) (A) Beginning July 1, 2022, facilities will be required to comply
with collection and reporting of quality metrics as specified by the
Department of Social Services, after consultation with the nursing home
industry, consumers, employees and the Department of Public Health.
Rate adjustments based on performance on quality metrics will be
phased in, beginning July 1, 2022, with a period of reporting only.
Effective July 1, 2023, the Department of Social Services shall issue
individualized reports annually to each nursing home facility showing
the impact to the Medicaid rate for such home based on the quality
metrics program. A nursing home facility receiving an individualized
quality metrics report may use such report to evaluate the impact of the
quality metrics program on said facility's Medicaid reimbursement. On
or after October 1, 2026, the Department of Social Services may establish
a quality metrics program, within available appropriations designated
for such purpose, to provide payments to nursing home facilities [(A)]
(i) for high-quality outcomes based on performance in the quality
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 289
metrics program, and [(B)] (ii) designed to incentivize the provision of
high-quality services to nursing home residents who are Medicaid
beneficiaries, as indicated in the individualized report issued to each
nursing home facility pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision.
Such quality metrics program shall evaluate nursing home facilities
based on national quality measures for nursing home facilities issued by
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and state-administered
consumer satisfaction measures. Such quality measures may be
weighted higher for desired outcomes, as determined by the
department. Not later than February 1, 2027, the department shall
submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to
the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies and human services on the implementation of the quality
metrics program.
(B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Department of Social Services shall make distributions,
from an annual pool of ten million dollars of enhanced Medicaid quality
performance payments, to eligible nursing home facilities based on each
nursing home facility's performance in the quality metrics program.
Payments will be determined based on the maximum quality score
points a nursing home facility may be awarded for its performance in
improving its quality metrics. In determining a nursing home facility's
maximum quality score points, the department may use the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services' nursing home quarterly metrics for
patients with stays of one hundred one days or longer, a consumer
satisfaction survey and Department of Public Health data. Nursing
home facilities that have been identified by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services as special focus facilities for serious quality of care
issues, special focus facility candidates or with an abuse icon on the
centers' Nursing Home Compare Internet web site shall not be eligible
for participation in the quality metrics program and shall not receive
payment. Enhanced Medicaid quality performance payments may be
prorated to stay within available appropriations.
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 289
(C) On and after July 1, 2026, the Department of Social Services shall
utilize the nursing component of the Patient Driven Payment Model
resident assessment to calculate quarterly adjustments to the Medicaid
nursing home facility reimbursement case-mix index scores. To align
Medicaid cost data with the Patient Driven Payment Model resident
assessment data, the department shall rebase nursing home facility
Medicaid per diem rates using the cost year ending September 30, 2024,
for rates effective July 1, 2026. To incorporate Patient Driven Payment
Model data into the Medicaid per diem payment calculation, the
department shall adjust Medicaid rates over a three-year phase-in
period. The three-year phase-in period shall use phase-in parameters,
including, but not limited to, budget adjustment factors, case-mix
neutrality factors and stop loss and stop gain corridors, as necessary, to
stay within available appropriations.
(D) Not later than July 1, 2026, the Department of Social Services shall
implement a Medicaid utilization pool that provides enhanced
Medicaid payments to nursing home facilities that have a resident payor
mix that comprises more than seventy-five per cent Medicaid members.
Utilizing annual Medicaid cost reports, the department shall determine
each nursing home facility's payor mix to identify nursing home
facilities eligible to receive enhanced Medicaid payments on an annual
basis. Payments shall be for the purpose of supporting increased
Medicaid utilization and enhanced access and services for Medicaid
members. Eligible nursing home facilities shall receive enhanced
Medicaid funding from a funding pool limited to two million five
hundred thousand dollars for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and
five million dollars for subsequent fiscal years. The Commissioner of
Social Services may prorate enhanced Medicaid utilization payments to
stay within available appropriations.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 17b-340d(a)(2)
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 289
AGE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4